output/dictionaries/Medzuslovjansky_KomboLatinicaKirilica.aff
FLAG long
SFX LB Y 80
SFX LB ti l .
SFX LB ti la .
SFX LB ti lo .
SFX LB ti li .
SFX LB razkazati skažu .
SFX LB razkazati skažem .
SFX LB razkazati skažeš .
SFX LB razkazati skaže .
SFX LB razkazati skažemo .
SFX LB razkazati skažete .
SFX LB razkazati skažut .
SFX LB ti h .
SFX LB ti še .
SFX LB ti hmo .
SFX LB ti ste .
SFX LB ti hu .
SFX LB razkazati skaži .
SFX LB razkazati skažimo .
SFX LB razkazati skažite .
SFX LB razkazati skažuči .
SFX LB razkazati skažučego .
SFX LB razkazati skažučemu .
SFX LB razkazati skažučim .
SFX LB razkazati skažučem .
SFX LB razkazati skažučih .
SFX LB razkazati skažučimi .
SFX LB razkazati skažuča .
SFX LB razkazati skažuču .
SFX LB razkazati skažučej .
SFX LB razkazati skažučeju .
SFX LB razkazati skažuče .
SFX LB razkazati skažemy .
SFX LB razkazati skažemogo .
SFX LB razkazati skažemomu .
SFX LB razkazati skažemym .
SFX LB razkazati skažemom .
SFX LB razkazati skažemo .
SFX LB razkazati skažema .
SFX LB razkazati skažemu .
SFX LB razkazati skažemoj .
SFX LB razkazati skažemoju .
SFX LB razkazati skažemi .
SFX LB razkazati skažeme .
SFX LB razkazati skažemyh .
SFX LB razkazati skažemym .
SFX LB razkazati skažemymi .
SFX LB ti vši .
SFX LB ti všego .
SFX LB ti všemu .
SFX LB ti všim .
SFX LB ti všem .
SFX LB ti vših .
SFX LB ti všimi .
SFX LB ti vša .
SFX LB ti všu .
SFX LB ti všej .
SFX LB ti všeju .
SFX LB ti vše .
SFX LB ti ny .
SFX LB ti nogo .
SFX LB ti nomu .
SFX LB ti nym .
SFX LB ti nom .
SFX LB ti ni .
SFX LB ti ne .
SFX LB ti nyh .
SFX LB ti nymi .
SFX LB ti na .
SFX LB ti nu .
SFX LB ti noj .
SFX LB ti noju .
SFX LB ti no .
SFX LB ti nje/xPxE .
SFX LB ti nja/xPxE .
SFX LB ti nju/xPxE .
SFX LB ti njem/xPxE .
SFX LB ti nij/xPxE .
SFX LB ti njam/xPxE .
SFX LB ti njami/xPxE .
SFX LB ti njah/xPxE .

SFX LC Y 62
SFX LC ti l .
SFX LC ti la .
SFX LC ti lo .
SFX LC ti li .
SFX LC ti nu .
SFX LC ti nem .
SFX LC ti neš .
SFX LC ti ne .
SFX LC ti nemo .
SFX LC ti nete .
SFX LC ti nut .
SFX LC ti h .
SFX LC ti še .
SFX LC ti hmo .
SFX LC ti ste .
SFX LC ti hu .
SFX LC ti ni .
SFX LC ti nimo .
SFX LC ti nite .
SFX LC ti nuči .
SFX LC ti nučego .
SFX LC ti nučemu .
SFX LC ti nučim .
SFX LC ti nučem .
SFX LC ti nučih .
SFX LC ti nučimi .
SFX LC ti nuča .
SFX LC ti nuču .
SFX LC ti nučej .
SFX LC ti nučeju .
SFX LC ti nuče .
SFX LC ti nemy .
SFX LC ti nemogo .
SFX LC ti nemomu .
SFX LC ti nemym .
SFX LC ti nemom .
SFX LC ti nemo .
SFX LC ti nema .
SFX LC ti nemu .
SFX LC ti nemoj .
SFX LC ti nemoju .
SFX LC ti nemi .
SFX LC ti neme .
SFX LC ti nemyh .
SFX LC ti nemym .
SFX LC ti nemymi .
SFX LC ti vši .
SFX LC ti všego .
SFX LC ti všemu .
SFX LC ti všim .
SFX LC ti všem .
SFX LC ti vših .
SFX LC ti všimi .
SFX LC ti vša .
SFX LC ti všu .
SFX LC ti všej .
SFX LC ti všeju .
SFX LC ti vše .
SFX LC i y .
SFX LC i a .
SFX LC i o .
SFX LC i je .

SFX LD Y 28
SFX LD 0 0/xPxE .
SFX LD y o/xBxPxE .
SFX LD y a/xPxE .
SFX LD y ogo/xPxE .
SFX LD y u/xPxE .
SFX LD y oj/xPxE .
SFX LD y om/xPxE .
SFX LD y omu/xPxE .
SFX LD 0 m/xPxE .
SFX LD y oju/xPxE .
SFX LD y i/xPxE .
SFX LD y e/xPxE .
SFX LD 0 h/xPxE .
SFX LD 0 mi/xPxE .
SFX LD mnogy bolši/zz .
SFX LD mnogy bolšego/zz .
SFX LD mnogy bolšemu/zz .
SFX LD mnogy bolšim/zz .
SFX LD mnogy bolšem/zz .
SFX LD mnogy bolše/zz .
SFX LD mnogy bolša/zz .
SFX LD mnogy bolšu/zz .
SFX LD mnogy bolšej/zz .
SFX LD mnogy bolšeju/zz .
SFX LD mnogy bolših/zz .
SFX LD mnogy bolšim/zz .
SFX LD mnogy bolšimi/zz .
SFX LD mnogy bolje/zz .

SFX LE Y 9
SFX LE 0 0/xPxE .
SFX LE i o/xPxBxO .
SFX LE i eri/xPxE .
SFX LE i ere/xPxE .
SFX LE i erij/xPxE .
SFX LE i erah/xPxE .
SFX LE i eram/xPxE .
SFX LE i erju/xPxE .
SFX LE i erami/xPxE .

SFX LF Y 28
SFX LF 0 0/xPxE .
SFX LF y o/xBxPxE .
SFX LF y a/xPxE .
SFX LF y ogo/xPxE .
SFX LF y u/xPxE .
SFX LF y oj/xPxE .
SFX LF y om/xPxE .
SFX LF y omu/xPxE .
SFX LF 0 m/xPxE .
SFX LF y oju/xPxE .
SFX LF y i/xPxE .
SFX LF y e/xPxE .
SFX LF 0 h/xPxE .
SFX LF 0 mi/xPxE .
SFX LF gky žši/zz .
SFX LF gky žšego/zz .
SFX LF gky žšemu/zz .
SFX LF gky žšim/zz .
SFX LF gky žšem/zz .
SFX LF gky žše/zz .
SFX LF gky žša/zz .
SFX LF gky žšu/zz .
SFX LF gky žšej/zz .
SFX LF gky žšeju/zz .
SFX LF gky žših/zz .
SFX LF gky žšim/zz .
SFX LF gky žšimi/zz .
SFX LF ky še/xPxE .

SFX LG Y 71
SFX LG sti dl .
SFX LG sti dla .
SFX LG sti dlo .
SFX LG sti dli .
SFX LG sti m .
SFX LG sti š .
SFX LG sti 0 .
SFX LG sti mo .
SFX LG sti te .
SFX LG sti dut .
SFX LG sti deh .
SFX LG sti deše .
SFX LG sti dehmo .
SFX LG sti deste .
SFX LG sti dehu .
SFX LG sti d .
SFX LG sti dmo .
SFX LG sti dte .
SFX LG sti duči .
SFX LG sti dučego .
SFX LG sti dučemu .
SFX LG sti dučim .
SFX LG sti dučem .
SFX LG sti dučih .
SFX LG sti dučimi .
SFX LG sti duča .
SFX LG sti duču .
SFX LG sti dučej .
SFX LG sti dučeju .
SFX LG sti duče .
SFX LG sti domy .
SFX LG sti domogo .
SFX LG sti domomu .
SFX LG sti domym .
SFX LG sti domom .
SFX LG sti domo .
SFX LG sti doma .
SFX LG sti domu .
SFX LG sti domoj .
SFX LG sti domoju .
SFX LG sti domi .
SFX LG sti dome .
SFX LG sti domyh .
SFX LG sti domym .
SFX LG sti domymi .
SFX LG sti domo .
SFX LG sti dši .
SFX LG sti dša .
SFX LG sti dše .
SFX LG sti deny .
SFX LG sti denogo .
SFX LG sti denomu .
SFX LG sti denym .
SFX LG sti denom .
SFX LG sti deni .
SFX LG sti dene .
SFX LG sti denyh .
SFX LG sti denymi .
SFX LG sti dena .
SFX LG sti denu .
SFX LG sti denoj .
SFX LG sti denoju .
SFX LG sti deno .
SFX LG sti denje/xPxE .
SFX LG sti denja/xPxE .
SFX LG sti denju/xPxE .
SFX LG sti denjem/xPxE .
SFX LG sti denij/xPxE .
SFX LG sti denjam/xPxE .
SFX LG sti denjami/xPxE .
SFX LG sti denjah/xPxE .

SFX LH Y 12
SFX LH koli ekoli .
SFX LH koli akoli .
SFX LH koli egokoli .
SFX LH koli ukoli .
SFX LH koli ejkoli .
SFX LH koli emkoli .
SFX LH koli emukoli .
SFX LH koli imkoli .
SFX LH koli ejukoli .
SFX LH koli ikoli .
SFX LH koli ihkoli .
SFX LH koli imikoli .

SFX LI Y 4
SFX LI tokoli egokoli .
SFX LI tokoli emkoli .
SFX LI tokoli emukoli .
SFX LI tokoli imkoli .

SFX LJ Y 13
SFX LJ ykoli okoli .
SFX LJ ykoli akoli .
SFX LJ ykoli ogokoli .
SFX LJ ykoli ukoli .
SFX LJ ykoli ojkoli .
SFX LJ ykoli omkoli .
SFX LJ ykoli omukoli .
SFX LJ koli mkoli .
SFX LJ ykoli ojukoli .
SFX LJ ykoli ikoli .
SFX LJ ykoli ekoli .
SFX LJ koli hkoli .
SFX LJ koli mikoli .

SFX LK Y 3
SFX LK e a .
SFX LK e u .
SFX LK 0 m .

SFX LL Y 3
SFX LL o a .
SFX LL o u .
SFX LL 0 m .

SFX LM Y 12
SFX LM jže že .
SFX LM ojže aže .
SFX LM jže gože .
SFX LM ojže uže .
SFX LM jže mže .
SFX LM jže muže .
SFX LM ojže ymže .
SFX LM že uže .
SFX LM ojže iže .
SFX LM ojže eže .
SFX LM ojže yhže .
SFX LM ojže ymiže .

SFX LN Y 11
SFX LN 0 0/xPxE .
SFX LN u o/xPxBxO .
SFX LN 0 i/xPxE .
SFX LN 0 a/xPxE .
SFX LN 0 ov/xPxE .
SFX LN 0 u/xPxE .
SFX LN 0 ah/xPxE .
SFX LN 0 am/xPxE .
SFX LN 0 om/xPxE .
SFX LN 0 ami/xPxE .
SFX LN 0 e/xPxE .

SFX LO Y 6
SFX LO 0 0/xPxE .
SFX LO a o/xPxBxO .
SFX LO ka ok/xPxE .
SFX LO 0 h/xPxE .
SFX LO 0 m/xPxE .
SFX LO 0 mi/xPxE .

SFX LP Y 10
SFX LP 0 0/xPxE .
SFX LP 0 o/xPxBxO .
SFX LP v ov/xPxE .
SFX LP 0 i/xPxE .
SFX LP 0 e/xPxE .
SFX LP 0 ij/xPxE .
SFX LP 0 ah/xPxE .
SFX LP 0 am/xPxE .
SFX LP v ovju/xPxE .
SFX LP 0 ami/xPxE .

SFX LQ Y 10
SFX LQ 0 0/xPxE .
SFX LQ a y/xPxE .
SFX LQ a u/xPxE .
SFX LQ a 0 .
SFX LQ a ě/xPxE .
SFX LQ 0 h/xPxE .
SFX LQ 0 m/xPxE .
SFX LQ a oju/xPxE .
SFX LQ 0 mi/xPxE .
SFX LQ a o/xPxE .

SFX LR Y 4
SFX LR tokoli ogokoli .
SFX LR tokoli omkoli .
SFX LR tokoli omukoli .
SFX LR tokoli ymkoli .

SFX LS Y 9
SFX LS 0 0/xPxE .
SFX LS a o/xPxBxO .
SFX LS a e/xPxE .
SFX LS a o/xPxE .
SFX LS a oj/xPxE .
SFX LS a yh/xPxE .
SFX LS a ym/xPxE .
SFX LS a oju/xPxE .
SFX LS a ymi/xPxE .
