output/dictionaries/Medzuslovjansky_KomboLatinicaKirilica.dic
prěrazkazati/LB
oděti/LC
mnogy/LD
mati/LE
volgky/LF
jesti/LG
sjesti/LG
čijkoli/LH
čtokoli/LI
kakykoli/LJ
ktorykoli/LJ
jezykotvorjenje/LK
jezykotvorstvo/LL
soglasje/LK
suglasje/LK
tojže/LM
kenguru/LN
nosilka/LO
žolv/LP
boa/LQ
kojkoli/LH
ktokoli/LR
narěčena/LS
slyti/LC
obuv/LP
znajema/LS
dorastla/LS
vozrastla/LS
zapeta/LS
kriva/LS
najesti/LG
objesti/LG
zebu/LN
prěměnna/LS
razjesti/LG
